District of Columbia statutes.
28:7-701

Applicability.

This article applies to a document of title that is issued or a bailment that arises on or after the effective date of this article. This article does not apply to a document of title that is issued or a bailment that arises before the effective date of this article even if the document of title or bailment would be subject to this article if the document of title had been issued or bailment had arisen on or after the effective date of this article. This article does not apply to a right of action that has accrued before the effective date of this article.

Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 9, 60 DCR 2634
This Act will apply prospectively only to documents of title issued or bailments that arise after the effective date of the Act.